finnishconsonant/Finnish.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +Part +Gen

LEXICON Root

Stems ;

LEXICON Stems
tukka Sinf;
kakku Sinf;
pappi Sinf;
tippa Sinf;
katto Sinf;
juttu Sinf;
tikka Sinf;
huppu Sinf;
rotta Sinf;
harakka Sinf;
anoppi Sinf;
ammatti Sinf;
lika Sinf;
maku Sinf;
rako Sinf;
tuke Sinf;
halko Sinf;
jalka Sinf;
virka Sinf;
nahka Sinf;
niska Sinf;
matka Sinf;
lanka Sinf;
linko Sinf;
puku Sinf;
suku Sinf;
tiuku Sinf;
raaka Sinf;
piispa Sinf;
kalpa Sinf;
varpu Sinf;
ripa Sinf;
sopu Sinf;
tapa Sinf;
kampa Sinf;
rumpu Sinf;
sampe Sinf;
sota Sinf;
pata Sinf;
kita Sinf;
rinta Sinf;
kanto Sinf;
ranta Sinf;
ilta Sinf;
kulta Sinf;
parta Sinf;
kerta Sinf;
vahti Sinf;
kosto Sinf;


LEXICON Sinf
+Part:a #;
+Gen:n #;
